Illinois, session 104th, SB3534.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Sections 15-135 and 15-198 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/15-135)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 15-135)7    Sec. 15-135. Retirement annuities; conditions. 8    (a) This subsection (a) applies only to a Tier 1 member. A 9participant who retires in one of the following specified 10years with the specified amount of service is entitled to a 11retirement annuity at any age under the retirement program 12applicable to the participant:13        35 years if retirement is in 1997 or before;14        34 years if retirement is in 1998;15        33 years if retirement is in 1999;16        32 years if retirement is in 2000;17        31 years if retirement is in 2001;18        30 years if retirement is in 2002 or later.19    A participant with 8 or more years of service after 20September 1, 1941, is entitled to a retirement annuity on or 21after attainment of age 55.22    A participant with at least 5 but less than 8 years of 23service after September 1, 1941, is entitled to a retirement   SB3534- 2 -LRB104 19242 RPS 32688 b1annuity on or after attainment of age 62.2    A participant who has at least 25 years of service in this 3system as a police officer or firefighter is entitled to a 4retirement annuity on or after the attainment of age 50, if 5Rule 4 of Section 15-136 is applicable to the participant.6    (a-5) A Tier 2 member is entitled to a retirement annuity 7upon written application if he or she has attained age 67 and 8has at least 10 years of service credit and is otherwise 9eligible under the requirements of this Article. A Tier 2 10member who has attained age 62 and has at least 10 years of 11service credit and is otherwise eligible under the 12requirements of this Article may elect to receive the lower 13retirement annuity provided in subsection (b-5) of Section 1415-136 of this Article. 15    (a-10) A Tier 2 member who has at least 20 years of service 16in this system as a police officer or firefighter is entitled 17to a retirement annuity upon written application on or after 18the attainment of age 55 60 if Rule 4 of Section 15-136 is 19applicable to the participant. The changes made to this 20subsection by Public Act 101-610 and this amendatory Act of 21the 104th General Assembly this amendatory Act of the 101st 22General Assembly apply retroactively to January 1, 2011. 23    (b) The annuity payment period shall begin on the date 24specified by the participant or the recipient of a disability 25retirement annuity submitting a written application. For a 26participant, the date on which the annuity payment period   SB3534- 3 -LRB104 19242 RPS 32688 b1begins shall not be prior to termination of employment or more 2than one year before the application is received by the board; 3however, if the participant is not an employee of an employer 4participating in this System or in a participating system as 5defined in Article 20 of this Code on April 1 of the calendar 6year next following the calendar year in which the participant 7attains the age specified under Section 401(a)(9) of the 8Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, the annuity payment 9period shall begin on that date regardless of whether an 10application has been filed. For a recipient of a disability 11retirement annuity, the date on which the annuity payment 12period begins shall not be prior to the discontinuation of the 13disability retirement annuity under Section 15-153.2. 14    (c) An annuity is not payable if the amount provided under 15Section 15-136 is less than $10 per month.16(Source: P.A. 101-610, eff. 1-1-20; 102-210, eff. 7-30-21.) 17    (40 ILCS 5/15-198)18    Sec. 15-198. Application and expiration of new benefit 19increases.20    (a) As used in this Section, "new benefit increase" means 21an increase in the amount of any benefit provided under this 22Article, or an expansion of the conditions of eligibility for 23any benefit under this Article, that results from an amendment 24to this Code that takes effect after June 1, 2005 (the 25effective date of Public Act 94-4). "New benefit increase",   SB3534- 4 -LRB104 19242 RPS 32688 b1however, does not include any benefit increase resulting from 2the changes made to Article 1 or this Article by Public Act 3100-23, Public Act 100-587, Public Act 100-769, Public Act 4101-10, Public Act 101-610, Public Act 102-16, Public Act 5103-80, or Public Act 103-548, or this amendatory Act of the 6104th General Assembly.7    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code or 8any subsequent amendment to this Code, every new benefit 9increase is subject to this Section and shall be deemed to be 10granted only in conformance with and contingent upon 11compliance with the provisions of this Section. 12    (c) The Public Act enacting a new benefit increase must 13identify and provide for payment to the System of additional 14funding at least sufficient to fund the resulting annual 15increase in cost to the System as it accrues.16    Every new benefit increase is contingent upon the General 17Assembly providing the additional funding required under this 18subsection. The Commission on Government Forecasting and 19Accountability shall analyze whether adequate additional 20funding has been provided for the new benefit increase and 21shall report its analysis to the Public Pension Division of 22the Department of Insurance. A new benefit increase created by 23a Public Act that does not include the additional funding 24required under this subsection is null and void. If the Public 25Pension Division determines that the additional funding 26provided for a new benefit increase under this subsection is   SB3534- 5 -LRB104 19242 RPS 32688 b1or has become inadequate, it may so certify to the Governor and 2the State Comptroller and, in the absence of corrective action 3by the General Assembly, the new benefit increase shall expire 4at the end of the fiscal year in which the certification is 5made. 6    (d) Every new benefit increase shall expire 5 years after 7its effective date or on such earlier date as may be specified 8in the language enacting the new benefit increase or provided 9under subsection (c). This does not prevent the General 10Assembly from extending or re-creating a new benefit increase 11by law.12    (e) Except as otherwise provided in the language creating 13the new benefit increase, a new benefit increase that expires 14under this Section continues to apply to persons who applied 15and qualified for the affected benefit while the new benefit 16increase was in effect and to the affected beneficiaries and 17alternate payees of such persons, but does not apply to any 18other person, including, without limitation, a person who 19continues in service after the expiration date and did not 20apply and qualify for the affected benefit while the new 21benefit increase was in effect.22(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 103-80, eff. 6-9-23; 23103-548, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)